Maine, session 132, LD1721.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §3106, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2023, c. 482, §15 and affected
by §43, is further amended to read:
6. Obligation to preserve container value. Notwithstanding subsection 8‑A, a
commingling group or its agent may refuse to accept, or pay the refund value and handling
costs to a dealer, redemption center or other person for, a beverage container that has been
sorted in a manner that is inconsistent with an approved commingling agreement or a
cooperative plan approved in accordance with section 3107, subsection 3-B, paragraph C
or processed by a reverse vending machine or account-based bulk processing program in a
way that has, for a nonrefillable beverage container, reduced the recycling value of the
container material below current market value when compared to material that is
unprocessed and sorted in an approved manner or, for a refillable beverage container, has
damaged the container in a manner that prevents its reuse unless the dealer or redemption
center pays the difference in material recycling value or the value of the refillable container
to the commingling group. Sorting or processing that prevents the recycling of material or
the reuse of refillable containers is not permitted. This subsection may not be interpreted
to prohibit a written processing agreement between a commingling group and a dealer or
redemption center and does not relieve a commingling group of its obligation under
subsection 8‑A to accept empty, unbroken and reasonably clean beverage containers.
Beginning July 15, 2025, the cooperative, on behalf of its member commingling groups,
shall negotiate agreements with dealers and redemption centers regarding processing
payments for each beverage container material type. The recycling value of a beverage
container includes but is not limited to commodity, transportation and proportional system
cost savings. The department shall adopt rules to establish the recycling value of beverage
containers under this subsection and the rules may authorize the use of a 3rd-party vendor
to determine if a beverage container has been processed by a reverse vending machine or
account-based bulk processing program in a manner that, for a nonrefillable beverage
container, has reduced the recycling value below current market value or, for a refillable
beverage container, has damaged the container in a manner that prevents its reuse. The
rules must outline the method of allocating among the parties involved the payment for
3rd-party vendor costs.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §3107, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 482, §22, is further
amended to read:
1. Commingling requirement. If initiators of deposit enter into a commingling
agreement pursuant to this section, commingling of beverage containers must be by all
containers of like deposit value, product group, material and size. Initiators of deposit may
not require dealers or redemption centers to further sort containers that belong to the
commingling group. An initiator of deposit required pursuant to section 3106, subsection
8 or 8‑A to pick up beverage containers subject to a commingling agreement also shall pick
up all other beverage containers subject to the same agreement. The initiator of deposit
may not require beverage containers that are subject to a commingling agreement to be
sorted separately by a dealer or redemption center. This subsection does not prevent dealers
or redemption centers from further commingling beverage containers, subject to section
3106, subsection 6.
Page 1 - 132LR2085(01)

Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §3107, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 166, §14, is amended
to read:
2. Commingling of like materials. For purposes of this section, containers are
considered to be of like materials if made up of one of the following:
A. Plastic;
B. Aluminum;
C. Metal other than aluminum; and
D. Glass. Clear flint glass;
E. Amber-brown glass;
F. Green-blue glass;
G. Clear polyethylene terephthalate;
H. Colored polyethylene terephthalate;
I. Clear high-density polyethylene;
J. Colored high-density polyethylene; or
K. Other plastic, glass or other materials that in the department's discretion are
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §3107, sub-§3-B, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 482, §26, is
amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The method by which the program will facilitate the transition from beverage
container sorting at redemption centers by brand to sorting by material type and,
for redemption centers that manually sort containers, by size and deposit value
within each material type. The program may facilitate the negotiation of
agreements with redemption centers to gather brand data through use of reverse
vending machines, account-based bulk processing programs or similar technology
as long as the cost of such data collection is paid by the program;